Florida, session 2026, HB39.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 125.0168, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
125.0168 Special assessments levied on recreational
vehicle parks regulated under chapter 513.—When a county levies
a non-ad valorem special assessment on a recreational vehicle
park regulated under chapter 513, the non-ad valorem special
assessment may shall not be based on the assertion that the
recreational vehicle park is comprised of residential units.
Instead, recreational vehicle parks regulated under chapter 513
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb39-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 39 2026
shall be assessed as a commercial entity in the same manner as a
hotel, motel, or other similar facility. The non-ad valorem
special assessment may not be levied against the portion of a
recreational vehicle parking space or campsite which exceeds the
maximum square footage of a recreational vehicle-type unit
pursuant to s. 320.01(1)(b), regardless of the size of the
recreational vehicle parking space or campsite. A county shall
consider the recreational vehicle park's occupancy rates to
ensure that any special assessment is fairly and reasonably
apportioned among the recreational vehicle parks receiving the
special benefit.
Section 2. Section 166.223, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
166.223 Special assessments levied on recreational vehicle
parks regulated under chapter 513.—When a municipality levies a
non-ad valorem special assessment on a recreational vehicle park
regulated under chapter 513, the non-ad valorem special
assessment may shall not be based on the assertion that the
recreational vehicle park is comprised of residential units.
Instead, recreational vehicle parks regulated under chapter 513
shall be assessed as a commercial entity in the same manner as a
hotel, motel, or other similar facility. The non-ad valorem
special assessment may not be levied against the portion of a
recreational vehicle parking space or campsite which exceeds the
maximum square footage of a recreational vehicle-type unit
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb39-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 39 2026
pursuant to s. 320.01(1)(b), regardless of the size of the
recreational vehicle parking space or campsite. A municipality
shall consider the recreational vehicle park's occupancy rates
to ensure that any special assessment is fairly and reasonably
apportioned among the recreational vehicle parks receiving the
special benefit.
Section 3. Section 189.052, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
189.052 Assessments levied on facilities regulated under
chapter 513.—When an independent or dependent special district
levies an assessment on a facility regulated under chapter 513,
the assessment may shall not be based on the assertion that the
facility is comprised of residential units. Instead, facilities
regulated under chapter 513 shall be assessed in the same manner
as a hotel, motel, or other similar facility. The assessment may
not be levied against the portion of a recreational vehicle
parking space or campsite which exceeds the maximum square
footage of a recreational vehicle-type unit pursuant to s.
320.01(1)(b), regardless of the size of the recreational vehicle
parking space or campsite. A special district shall consider the
recreational vehicle park's occupancy rates to ensure that any
assessment is fairly and reasonably apportioned among the
recreational vehicle parks receiving the special benefit.
Section 4. The amendments made by this act to ss.
125.0168, 166.223, and 189.052, Florida Statutes, first apply to
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb39-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 39 2026
the 2026 property tax roll.
Section 5. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb39-00